Vermont, session 2025-2026, H860.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. JUSTICE AND RECOVERY HUB AND SPOKE SYSTEM;
WORKING GROUP; REPORT
(a) Creation. There is created the Justice and Recovery Hub and Spoke
System Working Group to develop a proposal for a justice and recovery hub on
State land adjacent to the Costello Courthouse and the Department of Labor in
VT LEG #386375 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.860
2026 Page 2 of 5
downtown Burlington and to identify additional sites along public transit
corridors for justice and recovery spokes offering similar services.
(b) Membership. The Working Group shall be composed of the following
members:
(1) the Executive Director of the Chittenden County Regional Planning
Commission or designee;
(2) the Executive Director of the Central Vermont Regional Planning
Commission or designee;
(3) the Executive Director of the Northwest Regional Planning
Commission or designee;
(4) the Executive Director of the Addison County Regional Planning
Commission or designee;
(5) the Secretary of Human Services or designee;
(6) the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services or designee;
(7) the Chief Justice of the Vermont Supreme Court or designee;
(8) a codirector of the Land Access and Opportunity Board or designee;
and
(9) the General Manager of Green Mountain Transit or designee.
(c) Powers and duties. The Working Group shall assemble subcommittees
to address the following directives and may prioritize development of the
Justice and Recovery Hub.
VT LEG #386375 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.860
2026 Page 3 of 5
(1) Justice and recovery hub. The Working Group shall engage with the
City of Burlington and stakeholders local to Burlington, including housing
providers, private landowners, businesses, workers, neighbors, and
community-based service providers, to develop a proposal for a justice and
recovery hub to be constructed on State land adjacent to the Costello
Courthouse and the Department of Labor in Burlington as part of a coordinated
public-private partnership for the redevelopment of Burlington’s downtown
core. The proposal shall include as components of the justice and recovery
hub:
(A) a 200-bed residential facility for justice-involved individuals who
are detained or in reentry from incarceration;
(B) recovery housing and supportive housing for youth in transition,
prioritizing youth with history of involvement with the Department for
Children and Families; and
(C) nonresidential components, giving specific consideration to a
new firehouse or other public safety infrastructure, storefronts for small
businesses and service providers, and a public observation tower.
(2) Justice and recovery spokes. The Working Group shall engage with
municipalities and stakeholders across Addison, Chittenden, Franklin, and
Washington Counties, including housing providers, private landowners,
businesses, workers, neighbors, and community-based service providers, to
VT LEG #386375 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.860
2026 Page 4 of 5
identify potential sites along existing public transit corridors for the
coordinated redevelopment of State, municipal, and private land into recovery
spokes that may include recovery housing, secure recovery residences,
residential treatment facilities, and recovery shelters.
(3) Public engagement. The Working Group shall consider methods for
facilitating equitable public engagement leading up to any construction
resulting from the Working Group’s proposal, including using the parking lots
of the Costello Courthouse and the Department of Labor in downtown
Burlington as temporary shelter, supportive housing, or a community resource
hub during any public engagement process and identifying State land along
transit lines for similar use.
(d) Assistance. The Working Group shall have the administrative,
technical, and legal assistance of the Vermont Housing and Conservation
Board.
(e) Report. On or before January 15, 2027, the Working Group shall
submit a written report to the General Assembly with its proposals and any
recommendations for legislative action.
(f) Meetings.
(1) The Executive Director of the Chittenden County Regional Planning
Commission or designee shall call the first meeting of the Working Group to
occur on or before September 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386375 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.860
2026 Page 5 of 5
(2) The Working Group shall select a chair from among its members at
the first meeting.
(3) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
(4) The Working Group shall cease to exist on February 1, 2027.
(g) Compensation and reimbursement. Members of the Working Group
shall not be entitled to per diem compensation or reimbursement of expenses.
(h) Appropriation. The sum of $200,000.00 is appropriated to the Vermont
Housing and Conservation Board from the General Fund in fiscal year 2027
for the purposes of facilitating equitable stakeholder engagement across
Addison, Chittenden, Franklin, and Washington Counties and retaining any
expert staffing required to produce the proposal. Technology shall be used to
make any meeting as inclusive as possible. Amenities such as food and child
care shall be offered.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386375 v.3